Utah statutes.
41-6a-1103.   Carrying more persons than design permits prohibited --
Exception.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a bicycle or moped may not be used
to carry more persons at one time than the number for which it is designed or
equipped.
(2)  An adult rider may carry a child securely attached to the adult rider's
person in a back pack or sling.
